Utah statutes.
9-4-1402.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Community action agency" means a local subdivision of the state, a
combination of political subdivisions, a separate public agency, or a private
nonprofit agency which has the authority under its applicable charter or laws
to receive funds to support community action activities and other appropriate
measures designed to identify and deal with the causes of poverty in the
state, and which is designated as a community action agency by federal law,
federal regulations, or the governor.
(2)  "Community action program budget" means state funds, federal block
grants, and federal categorical grants that are received by the state for
community action activities.
(3)  "Community action statewide organization" means community action
programs, organized on a statewide basis, to enhance the capability of
community action agencies.
(4)  "Community Services Block Grant" means the Federal Community Services
Block Grant Act, 42 U.S.C. 9901 et seq., and any corresponding federal
regulations.
(5)  "Local share" means cash or in-kind goods and services donated to a
community action agency to carry out its responsibilities.
(6)  "Low-income person" means a person who is a member of a household with a
gross annual income equal to or less than 125% of the poverty standard
accepted by the federal agency designated to establish poverty guidelines.
(7)  "Office" means the State Community Services Office created in Section
9-4-1403.
(8)  "Service area" means the geographical area within the jurisdiction of a
community action agency or a community action statewide organization.
